Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.093

Municipal judge—Vacancy—Appointment.

Any vacancy in the municipal court due to a death, disability, or resignation of a municipal court judge shall be filled by the mayor, for the remainder of the unexpired term. The appointment shall be subject to confirmation by the legislative authority of the city or town if the legislative authority has the general power of confirmation over mayoral appointments. The appointed judge shall be qualified to hold the position of judge of the municipal court as provided in this chapter.

[ 1984 c 258 s 113.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.